Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 5
COLORADO NURSEHOME VISITOR PROGRAM

26.5-3-501. Short title.

The short title of this part 5 is the "Colorado Nurse Home Visitor Program Act".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 628, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.4-101 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-502. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that in order to adequately care for their newborns and young children, new mothers may often benefit from receiving professional assistance and information. Without such assistance and information, a young mother may develop habits or practices that are detrimental to her health and well-being and the health and well-being of her child. The general assembly further finds that inadequate prenatal care and inadequate care in infancy and early childhood often inhibit a child's ability to learn and develop throughout the child's childhood and may have lasting, adverse effects on the child's ability to function as an adult. The general assembly recognizes that implementation of a nurse home visitor program that provides educational, health, and other resources for new young mothers during pregnancy and the first years of their infants' lives has been proven to significantly reduce the amount of drug, including nicotine, and alcohol use and abuse by mothers, the occurrence of criminal activity committed by mothers and their children under fifteen years of age, and the number of reported incidents of child abuse and neglect. Such a program has also been proven to reduce the number of subsequent births, increase the length of time between subsequent births, and reduce the mother's need for other forms of public assistance. It is the intent of the general assembly that such a program be established for the state of Colorado, beginning with a limited number of participants and expanding by the year 2010 to be available to all low-income, first-time mothers in the state who consent to receiving services.

The general assembly further finds that, to implement such a program efficiently and effectively and to promote the successful implementation of partnerships between state public entities and the private sector, responsibility for the program should be divided between the department, which is responsible for financial administration of the program, and a health sciences facility at the university of Colorado, which is responsible for programmatic and clinical support, evaluation, and monitoring for the program, and such other responsibilities as described in this part 5. It is the intent of the general assembly that the department and the health sciences facility work collaboratively to share information in order to promote efficient and effective program implementation; however, neither entity is responsible for the other entity's statutorily prescribed duties.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 628, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.4-102 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-503. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Entity" means any nonprofit, not-for-profit, or for-profit corporation; religious or charitable organization; institution of higher education; visiting nurse association; existing visiting nurse program; county, district, or municipal public health agency; county department of human or social services; political subdivision of the state; or other governmental agency; or any combination thereof.

"Health sciences facility" means the Anschutz medical campus or a successor facility located at the university of Colorado health sciences center that is selected by the president of the university of Colorado pursuant to section 26.5-3-505 to assist the executive director in administering the program.

"Low-income" means an annual income that does not exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty line.

"Master settlement agreement" means the master settlement agreement, the smokeless tobacco master settlement agreement, and the consent decree approved and entered by the court in the case denominated State of Colorado, ex rel. Gale A. Norton, Attorney General v. R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co.; American Tobacco Co., Inc.; Brown & Williamson Tobacco Corp.; Liggett & Myers, Inc.; Lorillard Tobacco Co., Inc.; Philip Morris, Inc.; United States Tobacco Co.; B.A.T. Industries, P.L.C.; The Council For Tobacco Research--U.S.A., Inc.; and Tobacco Institute, Inc., Case No. 97 CV 3432, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

"Nurse" means a person licensed as a professional nurse pursuant to part 1 of article 255 of title 12 or accredited by another state or voluntary agency that the state board of nursing has identified by rule pursuant to section 12-255-107 (1)(a) as one whose accreditation may be accepted in lieu of board approval.

"Program" means the nurse home visitor program established in this part 5.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 628, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.4-103 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-504. Nurse home visitor program - created - rules.

There is established the nurse home visitor program to provide regular, in-home, visiting nurse services to low-income, first-time mothers, with their consent, during their pregnancies and through their children's second birthday. The program provides trained visiting nurses to help educate mothers on the importance of nutrition and avoiding alcohol and drugs, including nicotine, and to assist and educate mothers in providing general care for their children and in improving health outcomes for their children. In addition, visiting nurses may help mothers in locating assistance with educational achievement and employment. Any assistance provided through the program is provided only with the consent of the low-income, first-time mother, and she may refuse further services at any time.

The nurse home visitor program, as it existed prior to July 1, 2022, is transferred to the department of early childhood. All rules, orders, and awards of the state board of health concerning the nurse home visitor program adopted prior to July 1, 2022, continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law. All grants in existence as of July 1, 2022, are valid through June 30, 2023, and may be extended or renewed beyond said date.

The program must be administered in communities throughout the state by entities selected on a competitive basis by the health sciences facility and approved by the executive director. Any entity that seeks to administer the program shall submit an application to the department as provided in section 26.5-3-506. The entities selected pursuant to section 26.5-3-507 are expected to provide services to a minimum of one hundred low-income, first-time mothers in the community in which the entity administers the program; except that the executive director may grant a waiver of this requirement if the population base of the community does not have the capacity to enroll one hundred eligible families. The executive director shall consult with the health sciences facility prior to granting the waiver to ensure that the entity can implement the program within the smaller community and maintain compliance with the program requirements. A mother is eligible to receive services through the program if she is pregnant with her first child, or her first child is less than one month old, and her gross annual income does not exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty line.

The executive director shall promulgate, pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, rules to implement the program. The executive director shall base the rules establishing program training requirements, program protocols, program management information systems, and program evaluation requirements on research-based model programs that have been implemented in one or more other states for a period of at least five years and have shown significant reductions in:

The occurrence among families receiving services through the model program of infant behavioral impairments due to use of alcohol and other drugs, including nicotine;

The number of reported incidents of child abuse and neglect among families receiving services through the model program;

The number of subsequent pregnancies by mothers receiving services through the model program;

The receipt of public assistance by mothers receiving services through the model program;

Criminal activity engaged in by mothers receiving services through the model program and their children.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, the executive director shall adopt rules pursuant to which a nurse home visitation program that is in operation in the state as of July 1, 1999, may qualify for participation in the program if it can demonstrate that it has been in operation in the state for a minimum of five years and that it has achieved a reduction in the occurrences specified in subsection (3) of this section. Any program so approved is exempt from the rules adopted regarding program training requirements, program protocols, program management information systems, and program evaluation requirements so long as the program continues to demonstrate a reduction in the occurrences specified in subsection (3) of this section.

The department may propose to the executive director rules concerning program applications pursuant to section 26.5-3-506. Any such proposal must be made in consultation with the health sciences facility.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 629, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.4-104 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-505. Health sciences facility - duties.

The president of the university of Colorado shall identify a facility at the university of Colorado health sciences center with the knowledge and expertise necessary to:

Assist the executive director by selecting and presenting entities from among the applications submitted pursuant to section 26.5-3-506;

Provide programmatic and clinical support, evaluation, and monitoring for the program, including nurse practice support and training, clinical and programmatic technical assistance, compliance monitoring and support, program development and implementation support, and performance improvement monitoring and support, in communities throughout the state;

Cooperate with the department in connection with the department's financial administration of the program; and

Work with the state auditor's office as required in section 2-3-113 (4).

The health sciences facility is not responsible for the duties assigned to the department with respect to the program pursuant to section 26.5-3-507 (2)(b).

The health sciences facility shall perform the duties set forth in subsection (1) of this section to ensure that the program is implemented and operated according to the program training requirements, protocols, management information systems, and evaluation requirements established by department rule. The health sciences facility shall evaluate overall program implementation, operation, and effectiveness, and include that evaluation, along with any recommendations concerning the program's selected entities or changes in the program's implementation, operation, and effectiveness, including program training requirements, protocols, management information systems, or evaluation requirements, in the annual report submitted to the department pursuant to section 26.5-3-508.

The department shall compensate the health sciences facility for the health sciences facility's actual costs incurred in performing its duties pursuant to this part 5, as determined by the health sciences facility. Such duties and actual costs must be included in the scope of work in the agreement between the department and the health sciences facility for implementation of those duties and must include the costs incurred by any contractor or subcontractor of the health sciences facility for those duties. Such compensation must be paid out of the amount allocated for the health sciences facility's costs, in accordance with the maximum allocation of three percent of the amount annually allocated for the program pursuant to section 26.5-3-507 (2).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 631, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.4-105 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-506. Program applications - requirements.

An entity that seeks to administer the program in a community must submit an application to the department in accordance with department rules adopted in consultation with the health sciences facility. At a minimum, the application must specify the basic elements and procedures that the entity must use in administering the program. Basic program elements must include the following:

The specific training each nurse employed by the entity must receive to provide home nursing services through the program, which training must meet or exceed the visiting nurse training requirements established by department rule;

The protocols the entity must follow in administering the program, which protocols at a minimum must comply with the program protocols established by department rule;

The management information system the entity must use in administering the program, which at a minimum must comply with the management information system requirements established by department rule;

The reporting and evaluation system the entity must use in measuring the effectiveness of the program in assisting low-income, first-time mothers, which at a minimum must meet the reporting and evaluation requirements specified by department rule; and

An annual report to both the health sciences facility and the community in which the entity administers the program that reports on the effectiveness of the program within the community and is written in a manner that is understandable for both the health sciences facility and members of the community.

Any program application submitted pursuant to this section must demonstrate strong, bipartisan public support for and a long-time commitment to operation of the program in the community.

The department shall initially review the applications received pursuant to this section and submit to the health sciences facility for review those applications that include the basic program elements as required by department rules. Following its review, the health sciences facility shall submit to the executive director a list of the applying entities that the health sciences facility recommends to administer the program in communities throughout the state.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 632, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.4-106 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-507. Selection of entities to administer the program - grants - nurse home visitor program fund - created.

On receipt of the list of entities recommended by the health sciences facility, the executive director shall select the entities that will administer the program in communities throughout the state. In selecting entities, the executive director shall give special consideration to entities that are proposing to administer the program as a collaborative effort among multiple entities.

The executive director shall specify the amounts of the grants that entities selected to operate the program receive. The grants may include operating costs and additional amounts for training and development of any infrastructure, including but not limited to development of the information management system necessary to administer the program. The executive director shall determine the number of entities selected and the number of communities in which the program is implemented based on the money available in the nurse home visitor program fund created in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in section 26.5-3-508, the department is responsible for financial administration of this part 5, which includes compensating the health sciences facility pursuant to section 26.5-3-505 (4); paying grants to entities selected to administer the program; monitoring financial, contractual, and regulatory compliance; providing medicaid financing oversight; managing accounting and budgeting; and, in cooperation with the health sciences facility, managing grant applications as set forth in section 26.5-3-506. The department shall also cooperate with the health sciences facility's administration of programmatic and clinical support, evaluation, and monitoring of the program. The department is not responsible for any duties assigned to the health sciences facility with respect to the program, as described in section 26.5-3-505.

Grants awarded pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section are payable from the nurse home visitor program fund, which fund is created in the state treasury. The nurse home visitor program fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is administered by the department and consists of money transferred to the fund by the state treasurer from money received pursuant to the master settlement agreement in the amount described in subsection (2)(e) of this section. In addition, the state treasurer shall credit to the fund any public or private gifts, grants, or donations received by the department to implement the program, including any money received from the United States federal government for the program. The fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the department for grants to entities for operation of the program. The department may retain the amount needed to pay for the program's share of the department's indirect costs, as calculated under the federally approved cost allocation plan. In addition, the department may retain a total of up to five percent of the amount annually appropriated from the fund for the program, in order to compensate the health sciences facility pursuant to section 26.5-3-505 (4), as set forth in the scope of work in the agreement between the department and the health sciences facility, and to compensate the department for the actual costs the department incurs in implementing subsection (2)(b) of this section, as determined by the department; except that the portion of the costs to compensate the department for implementing subsection (2)(b) of this section must not exceed two percent of the amount annually appropriated from the fund for the program, and the portion of such costs to compensate the health sciences facility pursuant to section 26.5-3-505 (4), as set forth in the scope of work in the contract between the department and the health sciences facility, must not exceed three percent of the amount annually appropriated from the fund for the program. In addition, if the total amount annually appropriated from the fund for the program exceeds nineteen million dollars, the department and the health sciences facility shall assess whether a smaller percentage of the appropriated funds exceeding nineteen million dollars is adequate to cover their actual costs and shall jointly submit to the general assembly a report articulating their conclusions on this subject. The actual costs of the department include department personnel and operating costs and any necessary transfers to the department of health care policy and financing for administrative costs incurred for the medicaid program associated with the program. The actual costs of the health sciences facility include the facility's own actual program costs and those of its contractors and subcontractors. Any costs for time studies required to obtain medicaid reimbursement for the program may be paid from program funds and are not subject to the five percent limit in this section. Notwithstanding section 24-36-114, all interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund must be credited to the fund. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(c)(II) of this section, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund at the end of any fiscal year remains in the fund and must not be transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

On July 1, 2020, the state treasurer shall transfer four million two hundred thirty-seven thousand three hundred seventy-five dollars from the fund to the general fund.

It is the intent of the general assembly that general fund money not be appropriated for implementation of the program.

Pursuant to section 24-75-1104.5 (1.7)(a), and except as otherwise provided in section 24-75-1104.5 (5), for the 2016-17 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter so long as the state receives money pursuant to the master settlement agreement, the state treasurer shall transfer to the fund twenty-six and seven-tenths of the master settlement agreement money received by the state, other than attorney fees and costs, during the preceding fiscal year. The transfer must be from money credited to the tobacco litigation settlement cash fund created in section 24-22-115.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 633, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.4-107 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-508. Annual program review - audit.

The health sciences facility shall annually prepare and submit to the department a report including an evaluation of the implementation of the program, the results achieved by the program based on the annual reports submitted by the administering entities pursuant to section 26.5-3-506 (1)(e), the extent to which the program serves medicaid-eligible persons and provides services that may be provided in part through medicaid funding, and any recommendations concerning changes to the program, including any changes that may be appropriate to enable the program to receive and maximize medicaid funding. Each program contractor and subcontractor and each entity that administers the program shall work with the health sciences facility and the department to prepare the reports required pursuant to this section and section 2-3-113 (2). Any entity that is administering the program is subject to a reduction in or cessation of funding if the executive director, based on recommendations from the health sciences facility, determines that the entity is not operating the program in accordance with the program requirements established by department rule or is operating the program in such a manner that the program does not demonstrate positive results.

The state auditor's office, pursuant to section 2-3-113, shall audit each entity administering the program to determine whether the entity is administering the program in compliance with the program requirements and in an effective manner. The audit must be conducted and reported in accordance with section 2-3-113.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 635, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.4-108 as it existed prior to 2022.